src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Cases-Normal

+Nom: Clit ;
+Acc:%>%{I%}%{й%}г Clit ;

+Nom+Refl:%>%{г%}%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;  ! this is both nom and acc

+Gen:%>%{г%}%{I%}%{й%}н Clit ;
+Gen+Refl:%>%{г%}%{I%}%{й%}нх%>%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;

+Abl:%>%{г%}%{А1%}%{А2%}с Clit ;
+Abl+Refl:%>%{г%}%{А1%}%{А2%}с%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;

+Ins:%>%{г%}%{А1%}%{А2%}р Clit ;
+Ins+Refl:%>%{г%}%{А1%}%{А2%}р%>%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;

+Dat:%>%{а%}%{Д%} Clit ;               ! (with exceptional forms in т)
+Dat+Refl:%>д%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;  ! (with exceptional forms in т)

+Dat+Attr:% д%{А%}х%{ь%} Clit ;

+Gens:%>%{а%}н # ;


LEXICON Cases-ExtraN

+Nom: Clit ;
+Acc:%>%{I%}%{й%}г Clit ;

+Refl:%>%{г%}%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;  ! this is both nom and acc

+Gen:%>%{Н%}%{I%}%{й%} Clit ;
+Gen+Refl:%>%{Н%}%{I%}%{й%}нх%>%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;

+Abl:%>%{Н%}%{А1%}%{А2%}с Clit ;
+Abl+Refl:%>%{Н%}%{А1%}%{А2%}с%>%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;

+Ins:%>%{Н%}%{А1%}%{А2%}р Clit ;
+Ins+Refl:%>%{Н%}%{А1%}%{А2%}р%>%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;

+Dat:%>%{а%}%{Н%}д Clit ;               ! (with exceptional forms in т)
+Dat+Refl:%>%{Н%}д%{А1%}%{А2%} Clit ;  ! (with exceptional forms in т)

+Dat+Attr:% д%{А%}х%{ь%} Clit ;

+Gens:%>%{а%}н # ;

LEXICON PrnInfl

+Pron: Cases-Normal ;

LEXICON DetInfl

+Det: # ;

LEXICON Ninfl

+N: Cases-Normal ;
+N+Pl:%>%{н%}%{У%}%{У%}д Cases-Normal ;  ! (with exceptional forms)

LEXICON Ninfl-Person

+N: Cases-Normal ;
+N+Pl:%>% нар Cases-Normal ;

LEXICON Ninfl-NoPl

+N: Cases-Normal ;

LEXICON Ninfl-Pl

+N+Pl: Cases-Normal ;


LEXICON Ninfl-ExtraN

+N: Cases-ExtraN ;
+N+Pl:%>н%{У%}%{У%}д Cases-Normal ;  ! (with exceptional forms)

LEXICON Ninfl-ExtraN-NoPl

+N: Cases-ExtraN ;

LEXICON NP-COG-M

+N+Prop+Cog+Msc: Cases-Normal ;

LEXICON NP-ORG

+N+Prop+Org: Cases-Normal ; 
+N+Prop+Org+Attr: # ; 


LEXICON NP-TOP

+N+Prop+Top: Cases-Normal ; 
+N+Prop+Top+Attr: # ; 
